District of Columbia statutes.
42-2206

Issuance of rules.

Within 120 days of March 24, 1988, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 24, 1988, D.C. Law 7-96, § 7, 35 DCR 891
1981 Ed., § 45-3006.